Alaska statutes. Title 8. Business and Professions.
Article 6. General Provisions.

Sec. 08.04.680.
Definitions.

In this chapter, unless the context indicates otherwise,

“attest function” means

an audit or other engagement, if the performance of the audit or other engagement is established by the Statements on Auditing Standards;

a review of a financial statement, if the performance of the review is established by the Statements on Standards for Accounting and Review Services;

an examination of prospective financial information, if the performance of the examination is established by the Statements on Standards for Attestation Engagements;

an engagement, if the performance of the engagement is established by the Auditing Standards of the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board; or

any examination, review, or agreed upon procedure to be performed in accordance with the standards on attestation engagements as

developed by national accountancy organizations, including the American Institute of Certified Public Accountants and the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board; and

adopted by the board in regulation;

“board” means the Board of Public Accountancy;

“certificate” means a certificate granted under AS

08.04.100

;

“compilation service” means a service that

is performed as established by the Statements on Standards for Accounting and Review Services; and

presents, in the form of financial statements, information that is the representation of management, but does not express an assurance on the statements;

“department” means the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development;

“designated function” means

an audit or other engagement, if the performance of the audit or other engagement is established by the Statements on Auditing Standards;

an examination of prospective financial information, if the performance of the examination is established by the Statements on Standards for Attestation Engagements; or

an engagement, if the performance of the engagement is established by the Auditing Standards of the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board;

“home office” means the location specified by the client as the address to which an attest function service or a compilation service is directed;

“legal entity” means an organization that can organize as a legal person under the laws of this state;

“license” means a license issued under AS

08.04.105

or

08.04.195

;

“limited liability company” means an organization organized under AS 10.50 or a foreign limited liability company; in this paragraph, “foreign limited liability company” has the meaning given in AS

10.50.990

;

“member” means a person who has been admitted to membership in a limited liability company;

“out-of-state exemption” means the exemption provided under AS

08.04.421(b)

or (c);

“partnership” means a general partnership, a limited partnership, a limited liability partnership, or another form of partnership;

“permit” means a permit issued under AS

08.04.240

or

08.04.421(a)

;

“practice of public accounting” means the offering to perform or the performance as a person holding a license, practice privilege, or permit under this chapter of a service involving the use of accounting or auditing skills; in this paragraph, “accounting or auditing skills” includes preparing financial statements, issuing reports on financial statements, furnishing management services, furnishing financial advisory services, providing consulting services, preparing tax returns, advising on tax matters, or consulting on tax matters;

“practice privilege” means a practice privilege authorized under AS

08.04.420

;

“principal place of business” means the office location designated by an individual for the purposes of substantial equivalency and reciprocity;

“quality review” means a study, appraisal, or review of one or more aspects of the professional work of a person in the practice of public accounting, by a person who holds a certificate and who is not affiliated with the person being reviewed, conducted as prescribed under AS

08.04.426

;

“report,” when used with reference to an attest or compilation service,

means

an opinion, report, or other form of language that states or implies assurance as to the reliability of financial statements and that also contains or is accompanied by a statement or implication that the person issuing it has special knowledge or competency in accounting or auditing, which may arise from use by the issuer of the report of names or titles indicating that the issuer is a certified public accountant or auditor, or from the language of the report itself;

any form of language that disclaims an opinion when the form of the language is conventionally understood to imply a positive assurance as to the reliability of the financial statements referred to or special competence on the part of the person issuing the language;

any other form of language that is conventionally understood to imply that assurance or special knowledge or competence;

does not include

a compilation of financial statement language that does not express or imply assurance or special knowledge or competence; or

the following disclaimer language when used by a person without a license, a practice privilege, or an out-of-state exemption in connection with financial statements:

“state” means a state of the United States, the District of Columbia, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, the Northern Mariana Islands, Guam, the United States Virgin Islands, and American Samoa.

“I (we) have prepared the accompanying (financial statements) of (name of entity) as of (time period) for the (period) then ended. This presentation is limited to preparing, in the form of financial statements, information that is the representation of management (owners).”; or

“I (we) have not audited or reviewed the accompanying financial statements and, accordingly, do not express an opinion or any other form of assurance on them.”;

History.

(§ 21 ch 187 SLA 1960; am §§ 13, 14 ch 82 SLA 1980; am § 4 ch 59 SLA 1982; am § 7 ch 14 SLA 1987; am § 18 ch 62 SLA 1991; am § 21 ch 29 SLA 1996; am § 52 ch 16 SLA 2006; am §§ 37 — 41 ch 67 SLA 2010; am §§ 6 – 8 ch 74 SLA 2018)

Revisor’s notes. —

The paragraphs of this section were renumbered in 1996 and 2010 to maintain alphabetical order.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective October 31, 2018, added (1)(E), and made related changes; in (19), added “an attest or compilation service” at the end of the introductory language, in (19)(A)(i), substituted “, which may arise” for “; a statement or implication of special knowledge or competence”, in (19)(A)(ii), deleted “except as provided in this paragraph, “report” includes” at the beginning, in (19)(A)(iii), deleted “and “report” includes” at the beginning, in (19)(B), deleted “’report’” at the beginning, and made related and stylistic changes; in (20), inserted “the Northern Mariana Islands” following “Puerto Rico,”, and “United States” preceding “Virgin Islands”.

The 2022 amendment, effective September 7, 2022, in (1)(E), inserted “, other than an examination described in (C) of this paragraph” following “any examination” and deleted “to be” following “procedure”; rewrote (4), which read, “ ‘compilation service’ means a service that (A) is performed as established by the Statements on Standards for Accounting and Review Services; and (B) presents, in the form of financial statements, information that is the representation of management, but does not express an assurance on the statements;”; repealed (6), (7), and (12); in (14), deleted “or 08.04.421(a)” at the end; in (15), deleted “on financial statements” following “issuing reports”; repealed (18); in (19), in the introductory language, inserted “function” following “attest”, in (19)(A)(i) and (ii) inserted “the attested information or complied” following “reliability of”, or similar, in (19)(B)(ii), deleted “, or an out-of-state exemption” following “practice privilege” and made related and stylistic changes; in (20), inserted “Commonwealth of the” preceding “Northern Mariana Islands”; added (21) through (23).

Sec. 08.04.680.
Definitions.

In this chapter, unless the context indicates otherwise,

“attest function” means

an audit or other engagement, if the performance of the audit or other engagement is established by the Statements on Auditing Standards;

a review of a financial statement, if the performance of the review is established by the Statements on Standards for Accounting and Review Services;

an examination of prospective financial information, if the performance of the examination is established by the Statements on Standards for Attestation Engagements;

an engagement, if the performance of the engagement is established by the Auditing Standards of the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board; or

any examination, other than an examination described in (C) of this paragraph, review, or agreed upon procedure performed in accordance with the standards on attestation engagements as

developed by national accountancy organizations, including the American Institute of Certified Public Accountants and the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board; and

adopted by the board in regulation;

“board” means the Board of Public Accountancy;

“certificate” means a certificate granted under AS

08.04.100

;

“compilation service” means a service of any compilation engagement performed in accordance with the Statements on Standards for Accounting and Review Services;

“department” means the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development;

[Repealed, § 44 ch 5 SLA 2022.]

[Repealed, § 44 ch 5 SLA 2022.]

“legal entity” means an organization that can organize as a legal person under the laws of this state;

“license” means a license issued under AS

08.04.105

or

08.04.195

;

“limited liability company” means an organization organized under AS 10.50 or a foreign limited liability company; in this paragraph, “foreign limited liability company” has the meaning given in AS

10.50.990

;

“member” means a person who has been admitted to membership in a limited liability company;

[Repealed, § 44 ch 5 SLA 2022.]

“partnership” means a general partnership, a limited partnership, a limited liability partnership, or another form of partnership;

“permit” means a permit issued under AS

08.04.240

;

“practice of public accounting” means the offering to perform or the performance as a person holding a license, practice privilege, or permit under this chapter of a service involving the use of accounting or auditing skills; in this paragraph, “accounting or auditing skills” includes preparing financial statements, issuing reports, furnishing management services, furnishing financial advisory services, providing consulting services, preparing tax returns, advising on tax matters, or consulting on tax matters;

“practice privilege” means a practice privilege authorized under AS

08.04.420

;

“principal place of business” means the office location designated by an individual for the purposes of substantial equivalency and reciprocity;

[Repealed, § 44 ch 5 SLA 2022.]

“report,” when used with reference to an attest function or compilation service,

means

an opinion, report, or other form of language that states or implies assurance as to the reliability of the attested information or compiled financial statements and that also contains or is accompanied by a statement or implication that the person issuing it has special knowledge or competency in accounting or auditing, which may arise from use by the issuer of the report of names or titles indicating that the issuer is a certified public accountant or auditor, or from the language of the report itself;

any form of language that disclaims an opinion when the form of the language is conventionally understood to imply a positive assurance as to the reliability of the attested information or compiled financial statements referred to or special competence on the part of the person issuing the language;

any other form of language that is conventionally understood to imply that assurance or special knowledge or competence;

does not include

a compilation of financial statement language that does not express or imply assurance or special knowledge or competence; or

the following disclaimer language when used by a person without a license or practice privilege in connection with financial statements:

“state” means a state of the United States, the District of Columbia, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, the Commonwealth of the Northern Mariana Islands, Guam, the United States Virgin Islands, and American Samoa.

“firm” means a sole proprietorship, partnership, limited liability company, corporation, or other legal entity;

“peer review” means a study, appraisal, or review of one or more aspects of the professional work of a person in the practice of public accounting who issues attests conducted as prescribed under AS

08.04.426

by a person who holds a certificate and who is not affiliated with the person being reviewed;

“preparation of financial statements” means providing a service of any preparation of financial statements engagement to be performed in accordance with the Statements on Standards for Accounting and Review Services.

“I (we) have prepared the accompanying (financial statements) of (name of entity) as of (time period) for the (period) then ended. This presentation is limited to preparing, in the form of financial statements, information that is the representation of management (owners).”; or

“I (we) have not audited or reviewed the accompanying financial statements and, accordingly, do not express an opinion or any other form of assurance on them.”;

History.

(§ 21 ch 187 SLA 1960; am §§ 13, 14 ch 82 SLA 1980; am § 4 ch 59 SLA 1982; am § 7 ch 14 SLA 1987; am § 18 ch 62 SLA 1991; am § 21 ch 29 SLA 1996; am § 52 ch 16 SLA 2006; am §§ 37 — 41 ch 67 SLA 2010; am §§ 6 – 8 ch 74 SLA 2018; am §§ 37 – 44 ch 5 SLA 2022)

Sec. 08.04.690.
Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the Accountancy Act.

History.

(§ 1 ch 167 SLA 1960; am § 5 ch 127 SLA 1974; am § 26 ch 147 SLA 1976)